dev/apertium-swe.pre-saldo-swe.dix
<pardef n="sov/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>       <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>       <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>    <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/jäla__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>jäla</l>        <r>jäla<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jäler</l>       <r>jäla<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jäls</l>        <r>jäla<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>al</l>        <r>jäla<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulit</l>         <r>jäla<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jäl</l>         <r>jäla<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jälande</l>     <r>jäla<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulen</l>         <r>jäla<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulet</l>         <r>jäla<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulna</l>        <r>jäla<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sv/ärja__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ärja</l>         <r>ärja<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärjer</l>        <r>ärja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärjes</l>        <r>ärja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ärjs</l>         <r>ärja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>ärja<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urit</l>         <r>ärja<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärj</l>          <r>ärja<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärjande</l>      <r>ärja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uren</l>         <r>ärja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uret</l>         <r>ärja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urna</l>        <r>ärja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="umg/ås__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ås</l>         <r>ås<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ås</l>        <r>ås<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>icks</l>       <r>ås<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åtts</l>       <r>ås<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Added from the pair is-sv END -->

    <!-- Adverbs -->

<pardef n="hur__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- PT: use the paradigm above instead
<pardef n="var__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
-->

<pardef n="då__adv"> <!-- PT -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aldrig__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/å__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärre</l>      <r>å<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärst</l>      <r>å<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ofta__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/väl__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>väl</l>       <r>väl<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bättre</l>    <r>väl<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bäst</l>      <r>väl<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/la__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>la</l>       <r>la<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="/lite__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>lite</l>      <r>lite<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mindre</l>    <r>lite<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>minst</l>     <r>lite<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/ycket__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>ycket</l>     <r>ycket<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>ycket<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r>ycket<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="rätt__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r><s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="väldig/t__adv">
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>t</l>     <r><s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r><s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Less frequent
<pardef n="rät/t__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="rä/tt__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>tt<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ddare</l>     <r>tt<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ddast</l>     <r>tt<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
-->

<!-- Added from the pair is-sv START -->

<pardef n="försiktig/t__adv">
  <e a="is">       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/ågt__adv">
  <e a="is">       <p><l>ågt</l>         <r>ågt<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ägre</l>      <r>ågt<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ägst</l>      <r>ågt<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="långsam/t__adv">
  <e a="is">       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mare</l>       <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mast</l>       <r>t<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Added from the pair is-sv END -->

    <!-- Conjunctions -->

<pardef n="eller__cnjcoo">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="att__cnjsub">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="när__cnjadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->

<pardef n="på__pr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

  </pardefs>

<e lm="av">              <i>av</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="genom">           <i>genom</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="före">            <i>före</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="vid">             <i>vid</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ovanpå">          <i>ovanpå</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="inom">            <i>inom</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="igenom">          <i>igenom</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="runtom" a="is">   <i>runtom</i><par n="på__pr"/></e>
<e lm="men">             <i>men</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="och">             <i>och</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="samt">            <i>samt</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="utan">            <i>utan</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="både">            <i>både</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="såsom">           <i>såsom</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="såväl">           <i>såväl</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="eftersom">        <i>eftersom</i><par n="att__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="så">              <i>så</i><par n="att__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="till dess att" a="PT">     <i>till<b/>dess<b/>att</i><par n="att__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="emedan" a="PT">            <i>emedan</i><par n="att__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="även om">         <i>även<b/>om</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="när">             <i>när</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="då">              <i>då</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="för">             <i>för</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="om">              <i>om</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="just">            <i>just</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="till">            <i>till</i><par n="när__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="blott" a="is">    <i>blott</i><par n="eller__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="förrän" a="is">   <i>förrän</i><par n="att__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="efter att" a="is"><i>efter<b/>att</i><par n="att__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="strax efter att" a="is"><i>strax<b/>efter<b/>att</i><par n="att__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="vad">             <i>vad</i><par n="hur__adv"/></e>
<e lm="när">             <i>när</i><par n="hur__adv"/></e>
<e lm="var" a="PT">             <i>var</i><par n="hur__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hur">             <i>hur</i><par n="hur__adv"/></e>
<e lm="varför">          <i>varför</i><par n="hur__adv"/></e>
<e lm="vart" a="PT">             <i>vart</i><par n="hur__adv"/></e>
<e lm="väldigt" a="PT">             <i>väldigt</i><par n="väldig/t__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sjukt" c="domain:general style:fam" a="PT">             <i>väldigt</i><par n="väldig/t__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ute">             <i>ute</i><par n="då__adv"/></e>
<e lm="igen">            <i>igen</i><par n="då__adv"/></e>
<e lm="emellertid">      <i>emellertid</i><par n="då__adv"/></e>
<e lm="lite">            <i></i><par n="/lite__adv"/></e>
<e lm="få">              <i>f</i><par n="f/å__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ofta">            <i>ofta</i><par n="ofta__adv"/></e>
<e lm="väl">             <i></i><par n="/väl__adv"/></e>
<e lm="la" c="style:dial" a="PT">             <i></i><par n="/la__adv"/></e>
<e lm="mycket">          <i>m</i><par n="m/ycket__adv"/></e>
<e lm="i våras" a="is">  <i>i<b/>våras</i><par n="då__adv"/></e>
<e lm="förut" a="is">    <i>förut</i><par n="då__adv"/></e>
<e lm="vederbörligen" a="is"><i>vederbörligen</i><par n="då__adv"/></e>
<e lm="betydligt" a="is"><i>betydlig</i><par n="försiktig/t__adv"/></e>
<e lm="försiktigt" a="is"><i>försiktig</i><par n="försiktig/t__adv"/></e>
<e lm="grundligt" a="is"><i>grundlig</i><par n="försiktig/t__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hastigt" a="is">  <i>hastig</i><par n="försiktig/t__adv"/></e>
<e lm="högt" a="is">     <i>högt</i><par n="då__adv"/></e>
<e lm="konstigt" a="is"> <i>konstig</i><par n="försiktig/t__adv"/></e>
<e lm="lågt" a="is">     <i>l</i><par n="l/ågt__adv"/></e>
<e lm="långsamt" a="is"> <i>långsam</i><par n="långsam/t__adv"/></e>
<e lm="rent" a="is">     <i>ren</i><par n="försiktig/t__adv"/></e>
<e lm="retsamt" a="is">  <i>retsam</i><par n="långsam/t__adv"/></e>
<e lm="tätt" a="is">     <i>tätt</i><par n="rätt__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ytter" a="is">    <i>ytter</i><par n="då__adv"/></e>
<e lm="rätt">            <i>rä</i><par n="rä/tt__adv"/></e>
<e lm="rätt">            <i>rät</i><par n="rät/t__adv"/></e>
<e lm="rätt">            <i>rätt</i><par n="rätt__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sova" a="is">     <i>sov</i><par n="sov/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stjäla" a="is">   <i>st</i><par n="st/jäla__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="svärja" a="is">   <i>sv</i><par n="sv/ärja__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="umgås" a="is">    <i>umg</i><par n="umg/ås__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="svära" a="PT">              <i>sv</i><par n="sv/ärja__vblex"/></e>
